Tennessee, session 114, SB0968.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-204-106, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) To facilitate the work of the council and for administrative purposes, the chair
of the council shall assign the administrative oversight responsibilities jointly to the
department of economic and community development and the department of
environment and conservation.
(b) The council shall meet quarterly, with members to be physically present at a
minimum of two (2) quarterly meetings each calendar year. Members may also
participate by teleconference call. Emergency meetings may be called by the chair or
upon petition by a majority of the council, with written notice being given to all members.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-204-103, is amended by deleting
subdivision (b)(1).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-204-108, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting the following:
- 2 - 002702

(a) The council shall compile, compose, and publish an initial report by July 1,
2026, on recommendations of policy and actions needed in order to address this state's
energy needs, including, but not limited to:
(1) Energy source and production goals by capacity;
(2) An analysis of each energy source's strengths, weaknesses,
opportunities, and threats;
(3) An assessment of the current capacity of each energy source against
projected demand; and
(4) An assessment of potential energy source extraction and delivery
systems, emerging innovative energy sources, and energy storage.
(b) The reports must be:
(1) Distributed electronically to all members of the energy, agriculture
and natural resources committee of the senate and the committee of the house
of representatives with subject jurisdiction over energy; and
(2) Available on the department of economic and community
development's and the department of environment and conservation's websites.
The departments must jointly notify any person who has registered through the
department's website by email of the report's availability.
(c) The departments must establish the frequency future reports will be
distributed, with the longest interval between distributions being two (2) years.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-204-104, is amended by deleting
subdivision (d)(3) and substituting:
(3) In case of a vacancy in the membership on the council prior to the expiration
of a member's term, a successor must be appointed within thirty (30) days of the
- 3 - 002702

vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term by the appointing authority who made
the original appointment and in the same manner as the original appointment.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 002702